Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB6170.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 2. As used in this act: (a) "Animal control officer" means a county animal control officer as described in sections 29a and 29b of the dog law of 1919, 1919 PA 339, MCL 287.289a and 287.289b, or a city, village, or township animal control officer as described in section 29c of the dog law of 1919, 1919 PA 339, MCL 287.289c. (b) "Animal control shelter" or and "animal protection shelter" means an animal control shelter or animal protection shelter, respectively, registered mean those terms as defined in section 1 of 1969 PA 287, MCL 287.331, and are facilities licensed with the department under section 6 4 of 1969 PA 287, MCL 287.336.287.334. (c) "Department" means the department of agriculture and rural development. (d) "Dog" means an animal a domestic dog of any age of the species Canisfamiliaris or Canislupusfamiliaris.Canis lupus familiaris. (e) "Expert on wolf-dog cross identification" means an individual who has, cumulatively, no fewer than 10 years of training and field experience in wolf and wolf-dog cross behavioral and morphological characteristics and who is recognized as an expert at the state and national levels by others in the same field. (f) "Facility" means an indoor or outdoor cage, pen, or similar enclosure where a wolf-dog cross is kept. (g) "Law enforcement officer" means: (i) A sheriff or sheriff's deputy. (ii) A village or township marshal. (iii) An officer of the police department of a city, village, or township. (iv) An officer of the Michigan state police. (v) A peace officer who is trained and licensed or certified under the Michigan commission on law enforcement standards act, 1965 PA 203, MCL 28.601 to 28.615. (vi) A conservation officer appointed by the department of natural resources. (vii) An animal control officer. (viii) A law enforcement officer of the federal government authorized to enforce any a federal law regulating animals. (h) "Livestock" means that term as defined in section 3 of the animal industry act, 1988 PA 466, MCL 287.703. (i) "Local unit" means a city, village, township, or county. (j) "Permit" means a permit issued under section 4. (k) "Permitting agency" means the agency of a local unit that issues permits under section 4. (l) "Person" means an individual, partnership, corporation, association, governmental entity, or other legal entity. (m) "Pet shop" means a pet shop licensed by the department under section 3 4 of 1969 PA 287, MCL 287.333.287.334. (n) "Veterinarian" means a person licensed to engage in the practice of veterinary medicine under article 15 part 188 of the public health code, 1978 PA 368, MCL 333.16101 333.18801 to 333.18838. (o) "Wolf" means an animal of any age of the species Canisrufus Canis rufus or Canislupus, Canis lupus, but does not include an animal of the species Canislupusfamiliaris.Canis lupus familiaris. (p) "Wolf-dog cross" means a canid resulting from the breeding of any of the following: (i) A wolf with a dog. (ii) A wolf-dog cross with a wolf. (iii) A wolf-dog cross with a dog. (iv) A wolf-dog cross with a wolf-dog cross. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02817'25) or House Bill No. 6167 (request no. H02817'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.